Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB273.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-120 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 10-120. (a) Whenever an election is required for the issuance of
bonds for any purpose by any municipality other than an irrigation district
or where a different procedure for giving notice of the election is
specifically provided by law, upon compliance with the legal requirements
necessary and precedent to the call for the election, the proper municipal
officers shall call an election. The election shall be held within 60 days
after compliance with the necessary requirements, or within 90 days,
should the longer period include the date of a general election on the date
of a general election, primary election or special election, as such terms
are defined in K.S.A. 25-2502, and amendments thereto.
(b) Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general
circulation in the municipality once each week for two consecutive weeks.
The first publication shall be not less than 21 days prior to the election.
Notice of the election shall also be published on the website of the county
election office of any county where the election is to be conducted. Such
notice shall be published not less than 21 days prior to the election and
shall remain on the website until the day after the election. The notice shall
set forth the time and place of holding the election and the purpose for
which the bonds are to be issued and shall be signed by the county election
officer. The election shall be held at the usual place of holding elections
and shall be conducted by the officers or persons provided by law for
holding elections in the municipality.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 25-1115 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 25-1115. (a) "General election" means the elections held on the
Tuesday following the first Monday in November of both even-numbered
and odd-numbered years, and in the case of an election of any officers to
fill vacancies held on a date other than the Tuesday following the first
Monday in November, the election at which any such officer is finally
elected.

SB 273 2
(b) "Primary election" means the elections held on the first Tuesday
in August of both even-numbered and odd-numbered years and any other
preliminary election held on a date other than the first Tuesday in August
at which part of the candidates for election to any national, state, county,
city, school or other municipal office are eliminated by the process of the
election but at which no officer is finally elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election that is not a general or
primary election, including, but not limited to, any mail ballot election
conducted pursuant to K.S.A. 25-431 et seq., and amendments thereto. A
special election shall not be held within 45 days of a general or primary
election but may be held on the same day as a general or primary election
held on the first Tuesday in March of any year.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 25-2006 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2006. As used in article 20 of chapter 25 of the Kansas Statutes
Annotated:
(a) "General election" means the election held for school officers on
the Tuesday following the first Monday in November of odd-numbered
years, and in the case of special elections of any school officers to fill
vacancies, the election at which any such officer is finally elected.
(b) "Primary election" means the election held on the first Tuesday in
August of each odd-numbered year, and any other preliminary election at
which part of the candidates for special election to any school office are
eliminated by the process of the election but at which no officer is finally
elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election held on the first Tuesday in
March of any year.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 25-2019 is hereby amended to read as follows: 25-
2019. (a) No school district shall call or hold more than one special bond
election at a time other than on the same date as a primary or general
election, at a special election or the election of board of education
members within any one calendar year; nor shall any special bond election
be held within sixty (60) days before or after a general election or election
of members of the board of education of such district. The provisions of
this act shall not prohibit the planning for or consideration of any bond
election during the period between authorized bond elections, nor shall this
act prohibit notice or other preparation for election during such period.
(b) The provisions of this act shall have no application to any capital
outlay tax levy or election for authorization thereof. This act shall apply to
every school district offering any of grades one to twelve and to
community junior colleges.
(c) This section shall not apply to bond elections held for the purpose
of replacing, or repairing and equipping school buildings or facilities
destroyed or substantially damaged by fire, windstorm, flood or other

SB 273 3
casualty, if approval for such election is obtained from the state board of
education.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 25-2502 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 25-2502. (a) "General election" means the elections held on the
Tuesday following the first Monday in November of both even-numbered
and odd-numbered years, and in the case of an election of any officers to
fill vacancies held on a date other than the Tuesday following the first
Monday in November, the election at which any such officer is finally
elected.
(b) "Primary election" means the elections held on the first Tuesday
in August of both even-numbered and odd-numbered years and any other
preliminary election held on a date other than the first Tuesday in August
at which part of the candidates for election to any national, state, county,
township, city, school or other municipal office are eliminated by the
process of the election but at which no officer is finally elected.
(c) "Special election" means any election that is not a general or
primary election, including, but not limited to, any mail ballot election
conducted pursuant to K.S.A. 25-431 et seq., and amendments thereto. A
special election shall not be held within 45 days of a general or primary
election but may be held on the same day as a general or primary election
held on the first Tuesday in March of any year.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 25-2006 and 25-2019 and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 10-120,
25-1115 and 25-2502 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.